Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.800

Transfer of employees to commission.

All employees of the department of labor and industries classified under the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, whose positions are entirely concerned with functions transferred to the commission by chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall be transferred to the jurisdiction of the commission.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 3.]